Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-611
Commissioner; general duties.

The Commissioner of Labor, with the advice and aid of advisory councils, shall take all appropriate steps to reduce and prevent unemployment; to encourage and assist in the adoption of practical methods of vocational training, retraining, and vocational guidance; to investigate, recommend, advise, and assist in the establishment and operation, by municipalities, counties, school districts, and the state, of reserves for public works to be used in times of business depression and unemployment; to promote the reemployment of unemployed workers throughout the state in every other way that may be feasible; and to these ends to carry on and publish the results of investigations and research studies.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 11, p. 392;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-711;

R.S.1943, § 48-611;

Laws 1984, LB 747, § 4.